motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
# v.: cg.p. 3° pers. pl.       # impr. 3° pers. pl. (vengano)

SFX À Y 39 # verbi terminanti in -ucire
SFX À re o ucire               # pres. 1° pers. sn. (ucio)
SFX À re 0 ucire               # pres. 2° pers. sn. (uci)
SFX À ire e ucire              # pres. 3° pers. sn. (uce)
SFX À re amo ucire             # pres. 1° pers. pl. (uciamo)
SFX À re te ucire              # pres. 2° pers. pl. (ucite)
SFX À re ono ucire             # pres. 3° pers. pl. (uciono)
SFX À re vo ucire              # impf. 1° pers. sn. (ucivo)
SFX À re vi ucire              # impf. 2° pers. sn. (ucivi)
SFX À re va ucire              # impf. 3° pers. sn. (uciva)
SFX À re vamo ucire            # impf. 1° pers. pl. (ucivamo)
SFX À re vate ucire            # impf. 2° pers. pl. (ucivate)
SFX À re vano ucire            # impf. 3° pers. pl. (ucivano)
SFX À re i ucire               # p.r. 1° pers. sn. (ucii)
SFX À re sti ucire             # p.r. 2° pers. sn. (ucisti)
SFX À ire ì ucire              # p.r. 3° pers. sn. (ucì)
SFX À re mmo ucire             # p.r. 1° pers. pl. (ucimmo)
SFX À re ste ucire             # p.r. 2° pers. pl. (uciste)
SFX À e ono ucire              # p.r. 3° pers. pl. (ucirono)
SFX À e ò ucire                # f.s. 1° pers. sn. (ucirò)
SFX À e ai ucire               # f.s. 2° pers. sn. (ucirai)
SFX À e à ucire                # f.s. 3° pers. sn. (ucirà)
SFX À 0 mo ucire               # f.s. 1° pers. pl. (uciremo)
SFX À 0 te ucire               # f.s. 2° pers. pl. (ucirete)
SFX À e anno ucire             # f.s. 3° pers. pl. (uciranno)
SFX À re a ucire               # cg.p. 1-2-3° pers. sn. (ucia)
SFX À re ate ucire             # cg.p. 2° pers. pl. (uciate)
SFX À re ano ucire             # cg.p. 3° pers. pl. (uciano)
SFX À re ssi ucire             # cg.i. 1-2° pers. sn. (ucissi)
SFX À re sse ucire             # cg.i. 3° pers. sn. (ucisse)
SFX À re ssimo ucire           # cg.i. 1° pers. pl. (ucissimo)
SFX À re ssero ucire           # cg.i. 3° pers. pl. (ucissero)
SFX À 0 i ucire                # cd.p. 1° pers. sn. (ucirei)
SFX À 0 sti ucire              # cd.p. 2° pers. sn. (uciresti)
SFX À 0 bbe ucire              # cd.p. 3° pers. sn. (ucirebbe)
SFX À 0 mmo ucire              # cd.p. 1° pers. pl. (uciremmo)
SFX À 0 ste ucire              # cd.p. 2° pers. pl. (ucireste)
SFX À 0 bbero ucire            # cd.p. 3° pers. pl. (ucirebbero)
SFX À ire ente ucire           # p.pres. sn. (ucente)
SFX À ire enti ucire           # p.pres. pl. (ucenti)
# v.: pres. 1° pers. pl.       # cg.p. 1° pers. pl. (uciamo)
# v.: p.r. 2° pers. pl.        # cg.i. 2° pers. pl. (uciste)
# v.: pres. 2° pers. sn.       # impr. 2° pers. sn. (uci)
# v.: cg.p. 1-2-3° pers. sn.   # impr. 3° pers. sn. (ucia)
# v.: pres. 1° pers. pl.       # impr. 1° pers. pl. (uciamo)
# v.: pres. 2° pers. pl.       # impr. 2° pers. pl. (ucite)
# v.: cg.p. 3° pers. pl.       # impr. 3° pers. pl. (uciano)

SFX a Y 31
SFX a o a o
SFX a o e o
SFX a o i o
SFX a o ala o
SFX a o ane o
SFX a 0 ci o
SFX a 0 gli o
SFX a 0 gliela o
SFX a 0 gliele o
SFX a 0 glieli o
SFX a 0 glielo o
SFX a 0 gliene o
SFX a 0 cela o
SFX a 0 cele o
SFX a 0 celi o
SFX a 0 celo o
SFX a 0 cene o
SFX a 0 sela o
SFX a 0 sele o
SFX a 0 seli o
SFX a 0 selo o
SFX a 0 sene o
SFX a 0 la o
SFX a 0 le o
SFX a 0 li o
SFX a 0 lo o
SFX a 0 mi o
SFX a 0 ne o
SFX a 0 si o
SFX a 0 ti o
SFX a 0 vi o

SFX b Y 30
SFX b 0 ci [eio]
SFX b 0 la [eio]
SFX b 0 le [eio]
SFX b 0 li [eio]
SFX b 0 lo [eio]
SFX b 0 ne [eio]
SFX b 0 cela [eio]
SFX b 0 cele [eio]
SFX b 0 celo [eio]
SFX b 0 celi [eio]
SFX b 0 cene [eio]
SFX b 0 glielo [eio]
SFX b 0 gliela [eio]
SFX b 0 glieli [eio]
SFX b 0 gliene [eio]
SFX b 0 gliele [eio]
SFX b 0 mela [eio]
SFX b 0 mele [eio]
SFX b 0 melo [eio]
SFX b 0 meli [eio]
SFX b 0 mene [eio]
SFX b 0 mi [ei]
SFX b 0 gli [ei]
SFX b 0 vi [ei]
SFX b 0 ti [io]
SFX b 0 vela [eo]
SFX b 0 vele [eo]
SFX b 0 velo [eo]
SFX b 0 veli [eo]
SFX b 0 vene [eo]

SFX c N 10
SFX c i elo immi
SFX c i ela immi
SFX c i ele immi
SFX c i eli immi
SFX c i ene immi
SFX c 0 elo igli
SFX c 0 ela igli
SFX c 0 ele igli
SFX c 0 eli igli
SFX c 0 ene igli

PFX d Y 1
PFX d 0 stra .

PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 pre .

SFX g N 4
SFX g o a o
SFX g o e o
SFX g o i o
SFX g lo ne lo

PFX i Y 14
PFX i 0 l' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX i a l'A a
PFX i e l'E e
PFX i i l'I i
PFX i o l'O o
PFX i u l'U u
PFX i h l'H h
PFX i 0 L' [AEIOUH]
PFX i a L'A a
PFX i e L'E e
PFX i i L'I i
PFX i o L'O o
PFX i u L'U u
PFX i h L'H h
