motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
andate/JTXb
annunciando/De
annunziando/De
avvertendo/EeJ
avvisando/DeJ
babelico/pe
benedetto/YWedJa
benedica/edJ
benedicano/edJ
benedice/edJ
benedicemmo/edJ
benedicesse/edJ
benedicessero/edJ
benedicessi/edJ
benedicessimo/edJ
benediceste/edJ
benedicesti/edJ
benediceva/edJ
benedicevamo/edJ
benedicevano/edJ
benedicevate/edJ
benedicevo/edJ
benediciamo/bedJ
benediciate/edJ
benedici/edJb
benedico/edJ
benedicono/edJ
benedì/edJ
benedii/edJ
benedirà/edJ
benedirai/edJ
benediranno/edJ
benedirebbe/edJ
benedirebbero/edJ
benedire/edJI
benedirei/edJ
benediremo/edJ
benedireste/edJ
benediresti/edJ
benedirete/edJ
benedirò/edJ
benedisse/edJ
benedissero/edJ
benedissi/edJ
benedisti/edJ
benedite/bedJ
benediva/edJ
benedivamo/edJ
benedivano/edJ
benedivate/edJ
benedivi/edJ
bevete/b
cambrico/pe
canceroso/oe
cedendo/Ee
ceduto/Ge
citato/Fe
cognitivo/oe
colombiano/oe
commesso/aJ
compilando/De
compilare/AeI
compilato/Fe
componi/b
compresso/oe
concordatario/oe
conducete/bJ
conduci/bJ
confezionando/De
confezionare/AeI
confezionato/Fe
configurando/De
configurare/AeI
configurato/Fe
conoscendo/EeJ
conoscere/BeJI
consonantico/pe
contorcete/b
contorciamo/b
contraddetto/YWedJa
contraddica/edJ
contraddicano/edJ
contraddice/edJ
contraddicemmo/edJ
contraddicesse/edJ
contraddicessero/edJ
contraddicessi/edJ
contraddicessimo/edJ
contraddiceste/edJ
contraddicesti/edJ
contraddicevamo/edJ
contraddicevano/edJ
contraddicevate/edJ
contraddicevi/edJ
contraddicevo/edJ
contraddiciamo/bedJ
contraddiciate/edJ
contraddici/edJb
contraddico/edJ
contraddicono/edJ
contraddirà/edJ
contraddirai/edJ
contraddiranno/edJ
contraddirebbe/edJ
contraddirebbero/edJ
contraddirei/edJ
contraddiremmo/edJ
contraddiremo/edJ
contraddireste/edJ
contraddiresti/edJ
contraddirete/edJ
contraddirò/edJ
contraddisse/edJ
contraddissero/edJ
contraddissi/edJ
contraddite/bedJ
contrai/b
contrapponete/b
contrapponi/b
contundete/b
correndo/Ee
correre/BeI
corso/oe
crocifiggete/b
crocifiggiamo/b
cucire/ÀvI
dantesco/oeY
date/b
definendo/EeJ
descrivi/b
detto/eJa
diamo/b
dica/eJ
dicano/eJ
diccelo/g
dice/edJ
dicemmo/eJ
dicesse/eJ
dicessero/eJ
dicessi/eJ
dicessimo/eJ
diceste/eJ
dicesti/eJ
diceva/eJ
dicevamo/eJ
dicevano/eJ
dicevate/eJ
dicevi/eJ
dicevo/edJ
diciamo/bedJ
dici/edJ
dico/edJ
dicono/edJ
dì/eJ
digerendo/Ee
digeribilità/e
digli/c
dimmelo/g
dirà/edJ
dirai/edJ
diranno/eJ
direbbe/eJ
direbbero/eJ
dire/eJI
direi/eJ
diremmo/eJ
diremo/eJ
diresti/eJ
direte/eJ
dirò/eJ
disciogliamo/b
disciogli/b
disciogliete/b
disdetto/YWedJa
disdica/edJ
disdicano/edJ
disdice/edJ
disdicemmo/edJ
disdicesse/edJ
disdicessero/edJ
disdicessimo/edJ
disdiceste/edJ
disdicesti/edJ
disdiceva/edJ
disdicevamo/edJ
disdicevano/edJ
disdicevate/edJ
disdicevi/edJ
disdicevo/edJ
disdiciamo/bedJ
disdiciate/edJ
disdici/edJb
disdico/edJ
disdicono/edJ
disdirà/edJ
disdiranno/edJ
disdirebbe/edJ
disdirebbero/edJ
disdire/edJI
disdirei/edJ
disdiremmo/edJ
disdiremo/edJ
disdireste/edJ
disdiresti/edJ
disdirete/edJ
disdirò/edJ
disdisse/edJ
disdissero/edJ
disdissi/edJ
disdite/bedJ
disponi/b
disse/eJ
dissero/eJ
dissi/eJ
distrai/b
disubbidisci/b
disubbidite/b
disubbidito/a
dite/beJ
facendo/EJd
fare/PJdI
giottesco/oe
gualcisci/b
imponete/b
imponiamo/b
indetto/YWedaXi
indicemmo/edXi
indicesse/edXi
indicessero/edXi
indicessi/edXi
indicessimo/edXi
indiceste/edXi
indicesti/edXi
indiceva/edXi
indicevamo/edXi
indicevano/edXi
indicevate/edXi
indicevi/edXi
indicevo/edXi
indiciamo/bedXi
indiciate/edXi
indici/edbXi
indicono/edXi
indirà/edXi
indirai/edXi
indiranno/edXi
indirebbe/edXi
indirebbero/edXi
indire/edXTI
indirei/edXi
indiremmo/edXi
indiremo/edXi
indireste/edXi
indiresti/edXi
indirete/edXi
indirò/edXi
indisse/edXi
indissero/edXi
indissi/edXi
indite/bedXi
inducete/b
induciamo/b
installando/De
installare/ATXeI
installato/FTUe
interdetto/YWedaXi
interdica/edXi
interdicano/edXi
interdice/edXi
interdicemmo/edXi
interdicesse/edXi
interdicessero/edXi
interdicessi/edXi
interdicessimo/edXi
interdiceste/edXi
interdicesti/edXi
interdiceva/edXi
interdicevamo/edXi
interdicevano/edXi
interdicevate/edXi
interdicevi/edXi
interdicevo/edXi
interdiciamo/bedXi
interdiciate/edXi
interdici/edbXi
interdico/edXi
interdicono/edXi
interdì/edXi
interdirà/edXi
interdirai/edXi
interdiranno/edXi
interdirebbe/edXi
interdirebbero/edXi
interdire/edXTI
interdirei/edXi
interdiremmo/edXi
interdiremo/edXi
interdireste/edXi
interdiresti/edXi
interdirete/edXi
interdirò/edXi
interdisse/edXi
interdissero/edXi
interdissi/edXi
interdite/bedXi
legatario/oe
leggete/b
leggiamo/b
leggi/b
maledetto/YWedJa
maledica/edJ
maledicano/edJ
maledice/edJ
maledicemmo/edJ
maledicesse/edJ
maledicessero/edJ
maledicessi/edJ
maledicessimo/edJ
malediceste/edJ
maledicesti/edJ
malediceva/edJ
maledicevamo/edJ
maledicevano/edJ
maledicevate/edJ
maledicevi/edJ
maledicevo/edJ
malediciamo/bedJ
malediciate/edJ
maledico/edJ
maledicono/edJ
maledì/edJ
maledii/edJ
maledirà/edJ
maledirai/edJ
malediranno/edJ
maledirebbe/edJ
maledirebbero/edJ
maledire/edJI
maledirei/edJ
malediremmo/edJ
malediremo/edJ
maledireste/edJ
malediresti/edJ
maledirete/edJ
maledirò/edJ
maledisse/edJ
maledissero/edJ
maledissi/edJ
maledite/bedJ
malediva/edJ
maledivamo/edJ
maledivano/edJ
maledivate/edJ
maledivi/edJ
maledivo/edJ
mingete/b
mingiamo/b
ordinando/De
ordinare/ATXeqrI
ordinato/FTUeYqrs
prediccelo/g
predigli/c
producete/bJ
produci/bJ
proponete/bJ
proponi/bJ
ricomprendi/b
ricucire/ÀvI
ridiccelo/g
ridimmelo/g
riottieni/b
risommergete/b
sappiate/b
sappi/b
scelto/emWJY
scientifico/pYe
sciogli/b
scomponete/b
scomponi/b
scrivendo/EeJ
scucire/ÀvI
sdrucire/ÀvI
smungete/b
smungiamo/b
sommergiamo/bJ
spedisci/b
tieni/b
traducete/bJ
traduciamo/bJ
traduci/bJ
traiamo/b
trattieni/b
